apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="beløn/net__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>  <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>   <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>  <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>   <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nede</l> <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l> <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nete</l> <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>   <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l> <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>nedes</l> <r>net<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l> <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>tes</l> <r>net<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>   <r>net<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>nas</l>   <r>net<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hevdvunn/et__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>  <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>  <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>  <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>   <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l> <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="veldrei/d__adj" c="veldreid, veldreidd, veldreia el. veldreiet">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>dd</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dd</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dde</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dde</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ede</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ede</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ete</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ete</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e c="n"> <p><l>des</l> <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>etes</l> <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>as</l>   <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="far/get__adj" c="like øv/et, but allow farvet">
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>  <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>  <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gede</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gete</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gede</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>gedes</l> <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gete</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>getes</l> <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>gas</l>   <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <!-- farvet LR: -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vet</l>  <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vet</l>  <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vede</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vete</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vede</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="n"><p><l>vedes</l> <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vete</l> <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>vetes</l> <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l>   <r>get<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>vas</l>   <r>get<s n="n"/><s n="xpst"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="klarfarget">  <i>klarfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hevdvunnet">            <i>hevdvunn</i><par n="hevdvunn/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyvunnet">              <i>nyvunn</i><par n="hevdvunn/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjenfunnet">            <i>gjenfunn</i><par n="hevdvunn/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="myteomspunnet">         <i>myteomspunn</i><par n="hevdvunn/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvunnet">               <i>tvunn</i><par n="hevdvunn/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grønnfarget">     <i>grønnfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hennafarget">	<i>hennafar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hudfarget">	<i>hudfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="melkefarget">	<i>melkefar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="laksefarget">	<i>laksefar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kakifarget">	<i>kakifar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nasjonalfarget">	<i>nasjonalfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gullfarget">	<i>gullfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blåfarget">	<i>blåfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kremfarget">	<i>kremfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="neonfarget">	<i>neonfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="irrfarget">	<i>irrfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="elfenbeinsfarget">	<i>elfenbeinsfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gulrotfarget">	<i>gulrotfar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ufarget">	<i>ufar</i> <par n="far/get__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oscarbelønnet">	<i>oscarbeløn</i><par n="beløn/net__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nobelprisbelønnet">	<i>nobelprisbeløn</i><par n="beløn/net__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prisbelønnet">	<i>prisbeløn</i><par n="beløn/net__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skadeglad">	<i>skadegla</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="spelleglad">	<i>spellegla</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="storglad">	<i>storgla</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="full-ladd">	<i>full-lad</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="fulladd">	<i>fullad</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ukledd">	<i>ukled</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="pisseredd">	<i>pissered</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ugredd">	<i>ugred</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="pissredd">	<i>pissred</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="lysredd">	<i>lysred</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sjølbydd">	<i>sjølbyd</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="selvbydd">	<i>selvbyd</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="overflødd">	<i>overflød</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="grindbygd">	<i>grindbyg</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="slettbygd">	<i>slettbyg</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="selvfornøgd">	<i>selvfornøg</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sjølfornøyd">	<i>sjølfornøy</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ufornøyd">	<i>ufornøy</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="uttøyd">	<i>uttøy</i>	<par n="veldrei/d__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="rødskjegget">	<i>rødskjeg</i>	<par n="far/get__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="spredtbygget">	<i>spredtbyg</i>	<par n="far/get__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="råberget">	<i>råber</i>	<par n="far/get__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="mangegrenet">	<i>mangegre</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tettgrenet">	<i>tettgre</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="utgrenet">	<i>utgre</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ugrenet">	<i>ugre</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="mangegreinet">	<i>mangegrei</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tettgreinet">	<i>tettgrei</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="utgreinet">	<i>utgrei</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ugreinet">	<i>ugrei</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sagtannet">	<i>sagtan</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="piggfinnet">	<i>piggfin</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="rappmunnet">	<i>rappmun</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tokjønnet">	<i>tokjøn</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="ciskjønnet">	<i>ciskjøn</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="transkjønnet">	<i>transkjøn</i>	<par n="beløn/net__adj"/> </e>
